Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-245
All-lines insurer; impairment or insolvency; liabilities; how charged.

In the event of impairment or insolvency of an all-lines insurer, the excess of the liabilities of one class of insurance over the accumulated assets attributable to that class of insurance may be charged as necessary against the assets of the other class only to the extent that assets attributable to such other class exceed the amount of reserves and other liabilities of such other class.

Laws 1979, LB 332, § 4.